Tennessee, session 114, SB0258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-703, is amended by deleting
subdivision (19)(A)(i) and substituting:
(i) Any collection, storage, or distribution facility, or a treatment facility, other
than a treatment facility that treats solely for the purpose of softening hard water, under
control of the operator of such system and used primarily in connection with such
system; and
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or the application of any provision of this act to
any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to
that end, the provisions of this act are severable.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0258
001705
- 1 -